Louisiana, session 2026, SB473.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1462.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1462.2 Unlawfully prohibiting employee from voting
A. Except as provided in Subsection B of this Section, every employer
shall allow each employee time off, without any reduction in compensation,
during the regular work day to vote in person or by absentee ballot in any
election.
B. If the polls are open on election day at least two hours after the
employee's regular work day, the employer is not required to allow the
employee time off during the election as provided in Subsection A of this
Section.
C. An employer who fails or refuses to provide an employee the
opportunity to vote as provided in Subsection A of this Section, the employer
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1483 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 473
shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one
thousand dollars or not more than six months in jail.